Utah statutes.
62A-5-203.   Operation, maintenance, and repair of developmental center buildings and grounds.

(1)  The division shall operate, maintain, and repair the buildings, grounds, and physical properties of the developmental center.  However, the roads and driveways on the grounds of the  developmental center shall be maintained by the Department of Transportation.

(2)  The division has authority to make improvements to the buildings, grounds, and physical properties of the developmental center, as it deems necessary for the care and safety of the residents.

